.config/sublime-text-3/Packages/User/en_ru.aff
SFX 107 Y 162
SFX 107   чься жешься       чься
SFX 107   чься жется        чься
SFX 107   чься жетесь       чься
SFX 107   чься жемся        чься
SFX 107   чься жёшься       чься
SFX 107   чься жётся        чься
SFX 107   чься жётесь       чься
SFX 107   чься жёмся        чься
SFX 107   чься гутся        чься
SFX 107   чься гусь         чься
SFX 107   чь   жешь         чь
SFX 107   чь   жете         чь
SFX 107   чь   жет          чь
SFX 107   чь   жем          чь
SFX 107   чь   жёшь         чь
SFX 107   чь   жёте         чь
SFX 107   чь   жёт          чь
SFX 107   чь   жём          чь
SFX 107   чь   гут          чь
SFX 107   чь   гу           чь
SFX 107   ься  ся           уться
SFX 107   ься  ся           ояться
SFX 107   ься  ся           [жшщч]аться
SFX 107   ваться ешься        аваться
SFX 107   ваться ется         аваться
SFX 107   ваться етесь        аваться
SFX 107   ваться емся         аваться
SFX 107   ваться ются         аваться
SFX 107   ваться юсь          аваться
SFX 107   ваться ёшься        аваться
SFX 107   ваться ётся         аваться
SFX 107   ваться ётесь        аваться
SFX 107   ваться ёмся         аваться
SFX 107   вать ешь          авать
SFX 107   вать ете          авать
SFX 107   вать ет           авать
SFX 107   вать ем           авать
SFX 107   вать ют           авать
SFX 107   вать ю            авать
SFX 107   вать ёшь          авать
SFX 107   вать ёте          авать
SFX 107   вать ёт           авать
SFX 107   вать ём           авать
SFX 107   уться ешься        уться
SFX 107   уться ется         уться
SFX 107   уться етесь        уться
SFX 107   уться емся         уться
SFX 107   уться ёшься        уться
SFX 107   уться ётся         уться
SFX 107   уться ётесь        уться
SFX 107   уться ёмся         уться
SFX 107   уть  у            уть
SFX 107   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 107   уть  ете          уть
SFX 107   уть  ет           уть
SFX 107   уть  ем           уть
SFX 107   уть  ёшь          уть
SFX 107   уть  ёте          уть
SFX 107   уть  ёт           уть
SFX 107   уть  ём           уть
SFX 107   ться сь           уться
SFX 107   ться ешься        [^аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ться ется         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ться етесь        [^аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ться емся         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ться ются         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ться юсь          [^аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ть   т            уть
SFX 107   ть   т            оять
SFX 107   ть   т            [жшщч]ать
SFX 107   ть   ешь          [^аеоу]ять
SFX 107   ть   ете          [^аеоу]ять
SFX 107   ть   ет           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 107   ть   ем           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 107   ть   ют           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 107   ть   ю            [^аеоу]ять
SFX 107   яться ишься        ояться
SFX 107   яться ится         ояться
SFX 107   яться итесь        ояться
SFX 107   яться имся         ояться
SFX 107   яться ешься        [аеу]яться
SFX 107   яться ется         [аеу]яться
SFX 107   яться етесь        [аеу]яться
SFX 107   яться емся         [аеу]яться
SFX 107   яться ются         [аеу]яться
SFX 107   яться юсь          [аеоу]яться
SFX 107   ять  ишь          оять
SFX 107   ять  ите          оять
SFX 107   ять  ит           оять
SFX 107   ять  им           оять
SFX 107   ять  ешь          [аеу]ять
SFX 107   ять  ете          [аеу]ять
SFX 107   ять  ет           [аеу]ять
SFX 107   ять  ем           [аеу]ять
SFX 107   ять  ют           [аеу]ять
SFX 107   ять  ю            [аеоу]ять
SFX 107   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX 107   оваться уется        оваться
SFX 107   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX 107   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX 107   оваться уются        оваться
SFX 107   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX 107   овать уешь         овать
SFX 107   овать уете         овать
SFX 107   овать ует          овать
SFX 107   овать уем          овать
SFX 107   овать уют          овать
SFX 107   овать ую           овать
SFX 107   еваться уешься       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться уетесь       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться уемся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться уюсь         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 107   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 107   аться утся         даться
SFX 107   аться усь          даться
SFX 107   аться усь          [жшщч]аться
SFX 107   аться ишься        [жшщч]аться
SFX 107   аться ится         [жшщч]аться
SFX 107   аться итесь        [жшщч]аться
SFX 107   аться имся         [жшщч]аться
SFX 107   аться ешься        даться
SFX 107   аться ется         даться
SFX 107   аться етесь        даться
SFX 107   аться емся         даться
SFX 107   аться ёшься        даться
SFX 107   аться ётся         даться
SFX 107   аться ётесь        даться
SFX 107   аться ёмся         даться
SFX 107   ать  ут           дать
SFX 107   ать  у            дать
SFX 107   ать  у            [жшщч]ать
SFX 107   ать  ишь          [жшщч]ать
SFX 107   ать  ите          [жшщч]ать
SFX 107   ать  ит           [жшщч]ать
SFX 107   ать  им           [жшщч]ать
SFX 107   ать  ешь          дать
SFX 107   ать  ете          дать
SFX 107   ать  ет           дать
SFX 107   ать  ем           дать
SFX 107   ать  ёшь          дать
SFX 107   ать  ёте          дать
SFX 107   ать  ёт           дать
SFX 107   ать  ём           дать
